afilter-cnjsubcat.xfst
!
! Move the lexically specified subcat after the POS symbol.
!

define intSym @"intermediate-symbols.a";

regex  ⟨Cnj⟩ -> ⟨Cnj⟩ ⟨coo⟩ || ⟪coo⟫ intSym* _
    ,, ⟨Cnj⟩ -> ⟨Cnj⟩ ⟨adv⟩ || ⟪adv⟫ intSym* _
    ,, ⟨Cnj⟩ -> ⟨Cnj⟩ ⟨sub⟩ || ⟪sub⟫ intSym* _
    ,, [⟪adv⟫|⟪coo⟫|⟪sub⟫] -> 0
;
invert net
